Arkansas, session 2025, SB459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Very young children under ten (10) years of age should be
held accountable in an appropriate way, but do not have the intellectual
capacity and maturity to understand the consequences of their actions and the
charges against them, and scientific research has found that in children this
young, qualities such as impulse control and future orientation are not well
developed in the brain;
(2) Children under ten (10) years of age do not have the ability
to form mens rea or criminal intent, but should still receive services and
treatment when they engage in what would otherwise be delinquent or criminal
behavior; and
(3) States such as Texas, Louisiana, Mississippi, North Dakota,
South Dakota, and Kansas have set a minimum age of delinquency adjudication
*LJH185*
04-14-2025 14:03:04 LJH185

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 H4/14/25 SB459
of ten (10) years of age with no exceptions for specific crimes.
(b) Therefore, it is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a
minimum age of ten (10) years of age before a child may be adjudicated
delinquent, provided that in cases involving homicide, the child be
adjudicated a juvenile member of a family in need of services to ensure age-
appropriate accountability and treatment through the supervision of the
courts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-27-303(15), concerning the definition of
"delinquent juvenile" under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to
read as follows:
(15) “Delinquent juvenile” means:
(A) A a juvenile ten (10) years old or older who:
(i)(A) Has committed an act other than a traffic
offense or game and fish violation that, if the act had been committed by an
adult, would subject the adult to prosecution for a felony, misdemeanor, or
violation under the applicable criminal laws of this state;
(ii)(B) Has violated § 5-73-119; or
(iii)(C) Has violated § 5-71-217(d)(2),
cyberbullying of a school employee; or
(B)(D) Any juvenile Has been charged with capital murder,
§ 5-10-101, or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, subject to extended
juvenile jurisdiction;

/s/G. Leding











04-14-2025 14:03:04 LJH185